Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.409

Broadband mapping, deployment, and adoption—Reports.

(1) The department, in coordination with the utilities and transportation commission, and such advisors as the department chooses, may prepare regular reports that identify the following:

(a) The geographic areas of greatest priority for the deployment of advanced telecommunications infrastructure in the state;

(b) A detailed explanation of how any amount of funding received from the federal government for the purposes of broadband mapping, deployment, and adoption will be or have been used; and

(c) A determination of how nonfederal sources may be utilized to achieve the purposes of broadband mapping, deployment, and adoption activities in the state.

(2) To the greatest extent possible, the initial report should be based upon the information identified in the geographic system maps developed under the requirements of this chapter.

(3) The initial report should be delivered to the appropriate committees of the legislature as soon as feasible, but no later than January 18, 2010.

(4) Any future reports prepared by the department based upon the requirements of subsection (1) of this section should be delivered to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 15th of each year.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 606; 2009 c 509 s 5. Formerly RCW 43.105.376.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Findings—Intent—Purpose—Effective date—2009 c 509: See notes following RCW 43.330.400.